District of Columbia statutes.
42-902

Ownership of legations or residences by representatives of foreign governments.

An Act entitled “An Act to restrict the ownership of real estate in the territories to American citizens, and so forth,” approved March 3, 1887, be so amended that the same shall not apply to or operate in the District of Columbia, so far as relates to the ownership of legations, or the ownership of residences by representatives of foreign governments, or attaches thereof.

Mar. 9, 1888, 25 Stat. 45, ch. 30
1981 Ed., § 45-1302.
1973 Ed., § 45-1505.